bhojpuri.dix
    <pardef n="क/वन__rarti_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ेकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>नकर</l>
          <r>वन<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/इ__rarti_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="sg" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येनकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येनकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येनकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येनकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येनकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येनकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येनकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>येनकर</l>
          <r>इ<s n="pn" /><s n="pl" /><s n="p3" /><s n="o" /></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="सब/__rarti_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कर</l>
          <r>
            <s n="pn" />
            <s n="pl" />
            <s n="p3" />
            <s n="o" />
          </r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="सब">
      <i>सब</i>
      <par n="सब/__rarti_a" />
    </e>
    <e lm="">
      <i />
      <par n="/इ__rarti_a" />
    </e>
    <e lm="क">
      <i>क</i>
      <par n="क/वन__rarti_a" />
    </e>
    <e lm="क">
      <i>क</i>
      <par n="क/वन__rarti_a" />
    </e>
